Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

Annexation

6-51-101. Part definitions and definitions for § 6-51-301.

As used in this part and § 6-51-301, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Larger” and “smaller” refer to population and not area;

“Municipality” or “municipalities” means any incorporated city or cities, or town or towns, and does not include any utility district, sanitary district, school district, or other public service district, whether organized under public or private acts; and

“Notice” means publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least seven (7) days in advance of a hearing. The notice shall be satisfied by inclusion of a map that includes a general delineation of the area or areas to be annexed by use of official road names or numbers, or both, names of lakes and waterways, or other identifiable landmarks, as appropriate.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-308; Acts 1995, ch. 283, § 1; 2015, ch. 512, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1995, ch. 283, § 2 provided that the amendment by this act applies only to annexation ordinances passed on first reading on or after July 1, 1995.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “, whether by ordinance as stipulated in § 6-51-102(a)(1) and (b) or by referendum as stipulated in § 6-51-104(b),” following “The notice shall be satisfied” in the second sentence of (3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Cross-References. Special census after annexation, § 6-51-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 13, 15, 18.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Annexation Law: History, Analysis, and Proposed Amendments (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 577 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Alternative alteration of municipal boundaries, OAG 96-032, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (3/6/96).

Constitutionality of strip annexation, OAG 97-157, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 192 (12/01/97).

Annexation under metropolitan form of government. OAG 10-109, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (10/28/10).

6-51-102. Plan of services.

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, effective May 16, 2015.]

Before any territory may be annexed under this part, the governing body of the municipality shall adopt a plan of services establishing at least the services to be delivered and the projected timing of the services. Upon adoption of the plan of services, the municipality shall cause a copy of the plan of services to be forwarded to the county mayor in whose county the territory being annexed is located. The plan of services shall be reasonable with respect to the scope of services to be provided and the timing of the services.

The plan of services shall include, but not be limited to: police protection, fire protection, water service, electrical service, sanitary sewer service, solid waste collection, road and street construction and repair, recreational facilities and programs, street lighting, and zoning services. If the municipality maintains a separate school system, the plan shall also include schools and provisions specifically addressing the impact, if any, of annexation on school attendance zones. If the municipality does not maintain a separate school system, then the municipality shall provide written notice of the annexation to all affected school systems as soon as practicable, but in no event less than thirty (30) days prior to the public hearing requirement set forth in subdivision (b)(4). The plan of services may exclude services that are being provided by another public agency or private company in the territory to be annexed other than those services provided by the county.

The plan of services shall include a reasonable implementation schedule for the delivery of comparable services in the territory to be annexed with respect to the services delivered to all citizens of the municipality.

Before a plan of services may be adopted, the municipality shall submit the plan of services to the local planning commission, if there is one, for study and a written report, to be rendered within ninety (90) days after such submission, unless by resolution of the governing body a longer period is allowed. Before the adoption of the plan of services, a municipality shall hold a public hearing. Notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality not less than fifteen (15) days before the hearing. The notice shall include the locations of a minimum of three (3) copies of the plan of services, which the municipality shall provide for public inspection during all business hours from the date of notice until the public hearing.

A municipality may not annex any other territory if the municipality is in default on any prior plan of services.

If a municipality operates a school system, and if the municipality annexes territory during the school year, any student may continue to attend such student's present school until the beginning of the next succeeding school year unless the respective boards of education have provided otherwise by agreement.

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, effective May 16, 2015.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, effective May 16, 2015.]

After receiving the notice from the municipality, as provided in subdivision (b)(1), the county mayor shall notify the appropriate departments within the county regarding the information received from the municipality.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 2; 1961, ch. 320, § 1; 1969, ch. 136, § 1; 1971, ch. 420, §§ 1, 2, 3; 1972, ch. 844, § 1; 1974, ch. 753, §§ 1, 2, 8, 9; T.C.A., § 6-309; Acts 1980, ch. 849, § 1; 1981, ch. 522, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 867, § 1; 1986, ch. 734, § 1; 1987, ch. 87, § 1; 1988, ch. 787, § 1; 1998, ch. 1101, §§ 19, 20; 2003 ch. 90, § 2; 2003, ch. 225, § 1; 2005, ch. 411, §§ 1, 2, 7; 2008, ch. 818, § 3; 2014, ch. 707, §§ 2(a), 3; 2015, ch. 512, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

The provisions of former subdivisions (a)(2)(A)-(J)(i)-(iv) and (K) have been held unconstitutional, and have been deleted by authority of the code commission. Former subdivision (a)(2)(J)(v) was redesignated (a)(2)(E) in 1998.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1981, ch. 522 deleted “provided the ordinance shall not become operative until thirty (30) days after final passage” from the end of former subsection (a). However, because of qualifications on the applicability on the act deleting that material, and thus the continued applicability of the deleted language to certain counties, two versions of former subsection (a) have been set up: subdivision (a)(1), containing the language, and subdivision (a)(2)(A), reflecting the deletion of the language by Acts 1981, ch. 522. See Vollmer v. City of Memphis, 730 S.W.2d 619 (Tenn. 1987), and opinions of the attorney general, OAG 88-84 (4/15/88), including April 20, 1988 supplement to that opinion, as well as OAG U86-67 (4/7/86), regarding the constitutionality of various provisions in this section.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2008, ch. 818, § 3 amended this section by deleting former subdivisions (a)(2)(A)-(D). Former subdivision (a)(2) provided applicability provisions for former subdivisions (a)(2)(A)-(D) that were deleted by the act.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2014 ch. 707, § 2(b) provides that § 2(a), which deletes subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this section, prohibits any annexation by ordinance that is not both operative and effective prior to May 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective May 16, 2015, deleted former (a) which read: “(1) A municipality, when petitioned by a majority of the residents and property owners of the affected territory, or upon its own initiative when it appears that the prosperity of such municipality and territory will be materially retarded and the safety and welfare of the inhabitants and property endangered, after notice and public hearing, by ordinance, may extend its corporate limits by annexation of such territory adjoining its existing boundaries as may be deemed necessary for the welfare of the residents and property owners of the affected territory as well as the municipality as a whole; provided, that the ordinance shall not become operative until thirty (30) days after final passage thereof. During this thirty-day period, the municipality shall notify the county mayor in whose county the territory being annexed is located that territory located in the unincorporated part of the county is being annexed by the municipality. The notification shall include a copy of the annexation ordinance and a map of the area being annexed.“(2) The provisions of subdivision (a)(1) that are in conflict with this subdivision (a)(2) do not apply to any county having a population of not less than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625) nor more than three hundred nineteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (319,725), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census. In such county, if the proposal to extend the corporate limits by the annexation of territory adjoining the existing boundaries of a municipality is proposed by the municipality upon its own initiative by ordinance, the ordinance shall not become operative until an election is held at the expense of the proposing municipality for approval or disapproval of such annexation by the qualified voters who reside in the territory proposed for annexation. The operation of the ordinance shall be subject to approval of the voters who reside in such territory. The county election commission shall hold an election thereon, providing options to vote ‘For’ or ‘Against’ the ordinance, not less than forty-five (45) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the receipt of a certified copy of such ordinance, and a majority vote of those voting in the election shall determine whether the ordinance is to be operative. A vote ‘For’ the ordinance shall be a vote ‘For Annexation’ and a vote ‘Against’ the ordinance shall be a vote ‘Against Annexation.’ If the vote is for the ordinance, the ordinance shall become operative thirty (30) days after the date that the county election commission makes its official canvass of the election returns; such ordinance shall not become operative before the expiration of one hundred twenty (120) days following the final passage of the annexation ordinance. If the ordinance is rejected, all relevant provisions in this chapter shall apply to the question of annexation in such county.“(3)(A) No municipality having a population greater than ten thousand (10,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census shall, by means of annexation by ordinance upon its own initiative, increase the land area contained within its boundaries by more than twenty-five percent (25%) during any twenty-four-month period.“(B)(i) Subdivision (a)(3)(A) shall not apply to any municipality having a population of less than twelve thousand (12,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and the charter of which is provided for by a private act of the general assembly, and not under the general law of this title.“(ii) Subdivision (a)(3)(B)(i) shall not apply to any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand one hundred (34,100) nor greater than thirty-four thousand two hundred (34,200), or located in any county having a population of not less than thirty-seven thousand (37,000) nor greater than thirty-seven thousand one hundred (37,100), or located in any county having a population of not less than forty-nine thousand four hundred (49,400) nor greater than forty-nine thousand five hundred (49,500), each according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.”; deleted former (c) which read: “Anything contained in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, a municipality in any county having a population of over sixty-six thousand (66,000), except in those counties having a population of more than seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census; or in those counties that have the metropolitan form of government, shall have the supplemental right and authority to annex upon its own initiative by ordinance any territory without levying any municipal ad valorem taxes, except for actual municipal services rendered, and that the residents of, and persons owning property in, annexed territory shall be entitled to rights and privileges of citizenship, in accordance with the provisions of the annexing municipality's charter, immediately upon annexation as though such annexed territory had always been a part of the annexing municipality; and it shall be the duty of the governing body to put into effect with respect to an annexed area any charter provisions relating to representation on the governing body. Any municipality that exercises such right to annex is hereby authorized, required and shall levy separate ad valorem taxes for each municipal purpose or service, or both, within the existing limits of the city and shall levy only such taxes, if any, in any territory annexed hereunder when and if the municipal service or purpose for which such taxes have been imposed is actually being rendered; provided, that in the case of sanitary sewers, such sewers shall be furnished within thirty-six (36) months after ad valorem taxes become due.”; deleted former (d) which read: “In counties having a population of more than seven hundred thousand (700,000), or having a population of not less than two hundred sixty thousand (260,000) nor more than two hundred eighty thousand (280,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or in those counties that have the metropolitan form of government, a smaller municipality may, by ordinance, extend its corporate limits by annexation of any contiguous territory, when such territory within the corporate limits of a larger municipality is less than seventy-five (75) acres in area, is not populated, is separated from the larger municipality by a limited access express highway, its access ramps or service roads, and is not the site of industrial plant development. The provisions of this chapter relative to the adoption of a plan of service and the submission of same to a local planning commission, if there is such, shall not be required of the smaller municipality for such annexation.”; and deleted “(a)(1) or” prior to “(b)(1)” in (e).

The 2015 amendment substituted “under this part” for “under this section” in the first sentence of (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 707, § 8. May 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015.

Cross-References. Streets in annexed territory, § 7-31-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 13-16, 18; 21 Tenn. Juris., Quo Warranto, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Municipalities — Judicial Review of Annexation, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 825 (1969).

Symposium – Memphis in the Law: The Whitehaven Annexation Case (John J. Thomason), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 925 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Electronic signatures on petitions for municipal formation and annexation. OAG 12-80, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (8/2/12).

Absent invidious discrimination or an intent to circumvent the “one person, one vote” principle, annexation by municipal ordinance is constitutional. Neither the United States Constitution nor the Tennessee Constitution recognizes a right for a person to retain his or her real property in a particular unit of local government. OAG 13-58, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 59 (7/25/13).

6-51-103. Quo warranto to contest annexation ordinance — Appellate review.

Any aggrieved owner of property that borders or lies within territory that is the subject of an annexation ordinance prior to the operative date thereof, may file a suit in the nature of a quo warranto proceeding in accordance with this part, § 6-51-301 and title 29, chapter 35 to contest the validity thereof on the ground that it reasonably may not be deemed necessary for the welfare of the residents and property owners of the affected territory and the municipality as a whole and so constitutes an exercise of power not conferred by law. Notwithstanding any other section in this chapter, for purposes of this section, an “aggrieved owner of property” does not include any municipality or public corporation created and defined under title 7, chapter 82 that owns property bordering or lying within the territory that is the subject of an annexation ordinance requested by the remaining property owner or owners of the territory and whose property and services are to be allocated and conveyed in accordance with § 6-51-111, § 6-51-112 or § 6-51-301, or any contractual arrangement otherwise providing for such allocation and conveyance.

Subdivision (a)(1)(A) does not apply to the counties covered by subdivision (a)(2).

Any aggrieved owner of property, lying within territory that is the subject of an annexation ordinance prior to the operative date thereof, may file a suit in the nature of a quo warranto proceeding in accordance with this part, § 6-51-301 and title 29, chapter 35 to contest the validity thereof on the ground that it reasonably may not be deemed necessary for the welfare of the residents and property owners of the affected territory and the municipality as a whole, and so constitutes an exercise of power not conferred by law.

Subdivision (a)(2)(A) shall apply only in counties having a metropolitan form of government and in counties having populations of:

not less than nor more than

4,000 4,300

14,940 15,000

43,700 44,700

49,400 49,500

58,000 59,000

67,300 67,400

74,500 74,600

100,000 250,000

475,000 480,000

700,000

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in any county with a population of not less than two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) and not more than two-hundred ninety thousand (290,000) based upon the 1980 federal census.

The rendering of services under a mutual aid agreement, an automatic response agreement, an operational agreement, or any other agreement as allowed under a comprehensive growth plan, pursuant to chapter 58 of this title, or the providing of mutual aid or assistance under the Mutual Aid and Emergency and Disaster Assistance Agreement Act of 2004, compiled in title 58, chapter 8, is not admissible as evidence against the municipality in any action brought under this section or title 29, chapter 14.

The municipality shall have the burden of proving that an annexation ordinance is reasonable for the overall well-being of the communities involved.

If more than one (1) suit is filed, all of them shall be consolidated and tried as one (1) in the first court of appropriate jurisdiction in which suit is filed. Suit or suits shall be tried on an issue to be made up there, and the question shall be whether the proposed annexation is or is not unreasonable in consideration of the health, safety and welfare of the citizens and property owners of the territory sought to be annexed and the citizens and property owners of the municipality. Should the court find the ordinance to be unreasonable, or to have been done by exercise of powers not conferred by law, an order shall be issued vacating the ordinance and the municipality shall be prohibited from annexing, pursuant to the authority of § 6-51-102, any part of the territory proposed for annexation by such vacated ordinance for a period of at least twenty-four (24) months following the date of such order. In the absence of such finding, an order shall be issued sustaining the validity of such ordinance, which shall then become operative thirty-one (31) days after judgment is entered unless an abrogating appeal has been taken from the judgment, or unless the presiding court grants the municipality's petition to defer the effective date pursuant to subdivision (d)(2).

Upon petition of the municipality, the presiding court may, as part of the judgment sustaining the validity of the annexation ordinance, order that the effective date of the ordinance be fixed as December 31 following the date of entry of the judgment or determination of appeal. In making any order under this subdivision (d)(2), the court shall consider the necessity of the deferred effective date to render municipal services to the annexed territory within a reasonable time. The petition shall be filed by the municipality in the presiding court where the annexation ordinance is being contested in a quo warranto proceeding as provided in this section.

If on appeal judgment shall be against the validity of such ordinance, an order shall be entered vacating the same and the municipality shall be prohibited from annexing, pursuant to the authority of § 6-51-102, any part of the territory proposed for annexation by such vacated ordinance for a period of at least twenty-four (24) months following the date of such order. If judgment shall be in favor of the validity of such ordinance, it shall become operative forthwith by court order and shall not be subject to contest or attack in legal or equitable proceeding for any cause or reason, the judgment of the appellate court being final.

Should the territory hereafter sought to be annexed be the site of substantial industrial plant development, a fact to be ascertained by the court, the municipality shall have the burden of proving that the annexation of the site of the industrial plant development is not unreasonable in consideration of the factors above mentioned, including the necessity for or use of municipal services by the industrial plant or plants, and the present ability and intent of the municipality to benefit the industrial plant development by rendering municipal services thereto when and as needed. The policy and purpose of this provision is to prevent annexation of industrial plants for the sole purpose of increasing municipal revenue, without the ability and intent to benefit the area annexed by rendering municipal services, when and as needed, and when such services are not used or required by the industrial plants.

During the time that any annexation ordinance is being contested as provided in this section, the annexing municipality and the county governing body or any affected school, sanitary or utility district, or all such districts, may enter into an agreement to provide for new, expanded, and/or upgraded services and facilities, including, but not limited to, equipment, land and buildings, and capital expenditures, including sale of bonds, to finance such services and facilities, which agreement shall include an equitable division of the cost and liabilities of such capital expenditures between the annexing municipality and the county governing body or any affected school, sanitary, or utility district, or all such districts, upon final determination of such contested annexation ordinance.

When territory is annexed that is located in a county other than one in which the city hall of the annexing municipality is then located, any suit filed pursuant to this section for the purpose of contesting the annexation ordinance shall be filed in the county where the city hall of the annexing municipality is located. The chancellor, however, shall change the venue to a county that is adjacent to either the county where the annexing municipality's city hall is located or the county where the proposed annexation is located.

When a final judgment is rendered in a quo warranto suit contesting a proposed annexation, the municipality shall notify the county mayor of the outcome of the litigation, so the county may keep abreast of the status of a pending annexation. Similarly, when a municipality files an appeal of a decision in a quo warranto suit, the municipality shall notify the county mayor of the pending appeal.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 2; 1961, ch. 220, § 1; 1970, ch. 516, § 1; 1974, ch. 753, §§ 4, 8, 9; T.C.A., § 6-310; Acts 1982, ch. 867, § 2; 1984, ch. 642, §§ 1-10; 1989, ch. 326, § 1; 1989, ch. 327, § 1; 2005, ch. 264, § 2; 2005, ch. 411, § 4; 2013, ch. 462, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

The provisions relating to annexation ordinances referred to in this section, and formerly found in § 6-51-102(a), (c) and (d), were deleted by Acts 2014, ch. 707, § 2(a), effective May 16, 2015.

Cross-References. Consolidation, separate trials, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 42.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-42.01-1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 13, 14, 18; 21 Tenn. Juris., Quo Warranto, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Municipal Annexation in Tennessee, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 651 (1979).

Attorney General Opinions. Standing to contest city annexation ordinance, OAG 99-076, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (4/5/99).

6-51-104. Resolution for annexation by referendum — Notice.

A municipality, when petitioned by interested persons, or upon its own initiative, by resolution, may propose extension of its corporate limits by the annexation of territory adjoining to its existing boundaries; provided, however, no such resolution shall propose annexation of any property being used primarily for agricultural purposes. Notwithstanding this part or any other law to the contrary, property being used primarily for agricultural purposes shall be annexed only with the written consent of the property owner or owners.

A referendum is not required to effectuate annexation of territory if:

All of the property owners within the territory proposed for annexation consent in writing; or

[Effective until January 1, 2023.]

(a) Two-thirds (2/3) of the property owners within the territory proposed for annexation consent in writing;

The total area of the property owned by the owners consenting to annexation under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) is more than one-half (½) of the territory proposed for annexation; and

The proposed annexation consists of nine (9) or fewer parcels;

A municipality may by resolution propose annexation of territory that does not adjoin the boundary of the main part of the municipality, without extending the corporate limits of that territory, if the territory proposed for annexation is entirely contained within the municipality's urban growth boundary and is either:

To be used for industrial or commercial purpose or future residential development; or

Owned by one (1) or more governmental entities.

A resolution under this subsection (d) shall be ratified only with the written consent of the property owner or owners.

For purposes of this subsection (d), the boundary of the main part of the municipality is defined as the corporate limits of the territory containing its town seat or city hall. Territory that does not adjoin that boundary before a proposal to annex it is introduced cannot be annexed except as provided in this subsection (d).

The resolution shall include the plan of services adopted under § 6-51-102. The plan shall be prepared by the municipality in cooperation with the county in which the territory is located. The municipality and county shall enter into an interlocal agreement pursuant to § 5-1-113 to provide emergency services for any interceding properties and to maintain roads and bridges comprising the primary route to the area thus annexed as the municipality and county deem necessary.

[Deleted by 2017 amendment.]

Subdivision (a)(2)(B) is repealed January 1, 2023.

(1) (A) A copy of the resolution, describing the territory proposed for annexation, shall be promptly sent by the municipality to the last known address listed in the office of the property assessor for each property owner of record within the territory proposed for annexation. The resolution shall be sent by first class mail and shall be mailed no later than fourteen (14) calendar days prior to the scheduled date of the hearing on such proposed annexation. The resolution shall also be published by posting copies of it in at least three (3) public places in the territory proposed for annexation and in a like number of public places in the municipality proposing such annexation, and by publishing notice of such resolution at or about the same time in a newspaper of general circulation, if there is one, in such territory and municipality. The resolution shall also include a plan of services for the area proposed for annexation. The plan of services shall comply with the requirements of § 6-51-102, including the public hearing and notice requirements, prior to the adoption of the resolution. Upon adoption of the plan of services, the municipality shall cause a copy of the resolution to be forwarded to the county mayor in whose county the territory being annexed is located.

A person or persons with personal knowledge of the mailing of the resolutions to each property owner of record pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(A) may submit a notarized affidavit to the presiding officer of the municipality attesting that such resolutions were mailed in accordance with this subdivision (b)(1). Failure of a property owner to receive a notice that was mailed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(A) shall not be grounds to invalidate the annexation.

After receiving the notice from the municipality as provided in subdivision (b)(1), the county mayor shall notify the appropriate departments within the county regarding the information received from the municipality.

A resolution proposing annexation by written consent of the property owner or owners shall become effective only upon adoption of such resolution by the municipality.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-311; Acts 2005, ch. 411, §§ 5, 8; 2011, ch. 495, § 1; 2014, ch. 707, § 4; 2015, ch. 512, §§ 3, 11, 16; 2017, ch. 399, § 1; 2018, ch. 1047, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, effective May 16, 2015, in (a), added the proviso at the end of the first sentence and added the second and third sentences.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the fifth sentence of (b)(1)(A), which read: “The plan of services shall address the same services and timing of services as required in § 6-51-102” and added subsections (c) and (d).

The 2017 amendment deleted former (d)(5) which read: “This subsection (d) shall only apply in any county having a population according to the most recent decennial census that is greater than forty-four and one-half percent (44.5%) and fifty thousand (50,000) of its population in the preceding decennial census.”

The 2018 amendment added (a)(2); and, in present (a)(1), deleted the former last sentence which read: “A resolution to effectuate annexation of any property, with written consent of the property owner or owners, shall not require a referendum.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 495, § 2. July 1, 2011.

Acts 2014, ch. 707, § 8. May 16, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Acts 2017, ch. 399, § 2. May 18, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 1047, § 2. May 21, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 13, 18.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Eugene Puett), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1335 (1961).

Attorney General Opinions. Right of non-resident property owners to vote in annexation referendum. OAG 13-106, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (12/20/13).

6-51-105. Referendum on annexation.

At least thirty (30) days and not more than sixty (60) days after the last of such publications, the proposed annexation of territory shall be submitted by the county election commission in an election held on the request and at the expense of the proposing municipality, for approval or disapproval of the qualified voters who reside in or own property in the territory proposed for annexation; provided, that not more than two (2) persons are entitled to vote based upon ownership of an individual tract of property, regardless of the number of owners of such property.

The legislative body of the municipality affected may also at its option submit the questions involved to a referendum of the people residing within the municipality.

In the election or elections to be held, the questions submitted to the qualified voters shall be “For Annexation” and “Against Annexation.”

The county election commission shall promptly certify the results of the election or elections to the municipality. Upon receiving the certification from the county election commission, the municipality shall forward a copy of the certification to the county mayor in whose county the territory being annexed is located.

If a majority of all the qualified voters voting thereon in the territory proposed to be annexed, or in the event of two (2) elections as provided for in subsections (a) and (b), a majority of the voters voting thereon in the territory to be annexed and a majority of the voters voting thereon in the municipality approve the resolution, annexation as provided therein shall become effective thirty (30) days after the certification of the election or elections.

[Deleted by 2015 amendment.]

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-312; Acts 2005, ch. 411, § 6; 2015, ch. 512, § 4; 2019, ch. 408, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted (f), which read “The mode of annexation provided in this section is in addition to the mode provided in § 6-51-102.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “who reside in or own property in the territory proposed for annexation; provided, that not more than two (2) persons are entitled to vote based upon ownership of an individual tract of property, regardless of the number of owners of such property” for “who reside in the territory proposed for annexation” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Acts 2019, ch. 408, § 2. May 21, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 15, 16.

6-51-106. Abandonment of proceedings.

Any annexation proceeding initiated under § 6-51-104 may be abandoned and discontinued at any time by resolution of the governing body of the municipality.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-313; 2015, ch. 512, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “§ 6-51-102 or” preceding “§ 6-51-104”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 17.

6-51-107. Referral to planning agency.

The governing body of a municipality shall, if its charter so provides, and otherwise may, refer any proposed annexation to the planning agency of the municipality for study of all pertinent matters relating thereto, and the planning agency expeditiously shall make such a study and report to the governing body.

Acts 1955, ch. 113, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-314.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 17.